Wyoming, session 2025, HB0131.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-9-113 is amended to read:

22-9-113. Completing and return of ballot.

Upon receipt, a qualified elector shall mark the ballot and
sign the affidavit. The ballot shall then be sealed in the
inner ballot envelope and mailed or hand delivered to the
clerk. No county clerk, public employee or election
HB0131

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0483
official shall establish or use a drop box for the purpose
of collecting absentee ballots and no person shall deliver
an absentee ballot through any drop box. As used in this
section, "drop box" means any receptacle designed for the
receipt of absentee ballots, or for receipt of any other
type of filing, payment or other document, that would in
any way permit the delivery of an absentee ballot in a
manner other than through mail or hand delivery as required
by this section.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0131